Tennessee statutes. Title 5 Counties
Part 2

Bank Accounts

5-8-201. Deposits authorized — Finance committee — Securing of funds.

The county legislative body in regular session assembled, a quorum being present, is authorized to adopt a resolution to contract with a bank or banks making the highest and best bid or bids to pay interest on daily balances of the county's funds; and to appoint three (3) of its members, who, in conjunction with the county trustee and county mayor, shall constitute the county finance committee, with the county mayor as chair of the committee.

Before making any such contract, the trustee shall receive the bids from the banks and shall file an analysis of the bids that have been submitted with the county clerk who shall provide a copy of this report to each member of the county legislative body on or before the next meeting of the county legislative body. The analysis shall recommend the bank making the highest and best bid or bids to pay interest on daily balances of the county's funds, considering the lowest service charges, and considering other factors affecting safety and liquidity of county moneys.

Any county shall require any financial institution that becomes a depository of county funds to secure such funds as provided in a collateral pool created under title 9, chapter 4, part 5, or in the same manner and under the same conditions as state deposits under title 9, chapter 4, parts 1 and 4.

If the county finance committee does not have a contract with a bank or other financial institution, the county trustee may contract with a bank or banks or other financial institutions for deposit, safekeeping, and earning of interest on daily balances of the county's funds, according to the same terms as are required by this section for a county finance committee. Additionally, the county trustee is authorized to enter into such agreements with banks and other financial institutions as necessary for the maintenance of collateral to secure the daily balances of the county's funds on deposit with banks or other financial institutions.

Notwithstanding any general law or private act to the contrary, at least once every four (4) years and not less than once every term of office, the county trustee shall evaluate whether the contract entered into pursuant to this section should be rebid. The evaluation shall be based on obtaining proposals from at least two (2) banks or other financial institutions. The trustee shall prepare a written evaluation of the proposals and preserve the evaluation for a period of not less than three (3) years.

Acts 1909, ch. 305, § 1; Shan., § 647a1; Code 1932, § 1039; Acts 1977, ch. 435, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 16, 36; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, § 12; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 5-810; Acts 1992, ch. 592, §§ 1-5; 1993, ch. 315, §§ 9, 15; 1994, ch. 752, § 1; 2003, ch. 90, § 2; 2008, ch. 899, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2, directed the code commission to change all references from “county executive” to “county mayor” and to include all such changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.

Cross-References. Budget committee transfer of duties from finance committee, § 5-12-104.

Option to redesignate county mayor as county executive by private act, § 5-6-101.

5-8-202. Contracts — Execution and effect.

The finance committee, to carry out the will of the county legislative body, shall be vested with full power to formulate, make and sign a contract upon the terms and conditions specified, which contract shall be approved by the county mayor, and attested by the county clerk, with the county seal attached, on the part of the county, and shall be binding on the county.

Acts 1909, ch. 305, § 2; Shan., § 647a2; Code 1932, § 1040; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 16, 22, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 5-811; Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2, directed the code commission to change all references from “county executive” to “county mayor” and to include all such changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.

Cross-References. Option to redesignate county mayor as county executive by private act, § 5-6-101.

5-8-203. Contracts — Notice to trustee.

When the contract has been signed on the part of the county, and also signed by the proper officers, on the part of the bank or banks under the seal thereof, and a good and sufficient bond has been executed by the bank or banks, for the faithful performance of the contract and to save the county harmless, the finance committee shall so notify the county trustee, in writing, and order the county trustee to place all funds already in the county trustee's hands or that may thereafter be collected by the county trustee on deposit in the bank or banks, noting the funds that shall draw interest and the amount thereof.

Acts 1909, ch. 305, § 3; Shan., § 647a3; Code 1932, § 1041; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 5-812.

5-8-204. Deposit of funds by trustee.

Upon the receipt of the notice and order specified in § 5-8-203, it is made the duty of the county trustee to place all funds in the notice in the bank or banks designated therein.

Acts 1909, ch. 305, § 4; Shan., § 647a4; Code 1932, § 1042; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 5-813.

5-8-205. Liability of trustee.

From the date of the deposit, which shall be evidenced by the bank book, the county trustee shall be released from liability for losses to the county in consequence of the contract and deposit; but should the county trustee fail or refuse specifically to obey the order specified in § 5-8-203, the county trustee shall be held liable not only for the money collected and not so deposited, but for the interest on the funds mentioned in the contract, and as a penalty shall be liable for further interest equal in amount of the interest contracted for, all of which may be recovered by suit; and when collected the interest paid as penalty shall become the property of the contracting bank or banks, and the balance of the fund recovered, together with the cost, shall be paid to the county.

Acts 1909, ch. 305, § 5; Shan., § 647a5; Code 1932, § 1043; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 5-814.

5-8-206. Monthly statements.

Before the fifteenth of each month, each of the contracting banks shall render a statement to the county trustee, showing the balance on hand and the interest thereon due the county to the first of the month, and the county trustee shall, in the county trustee's monthly report to the county mayor, as required by § 67-5-1902(a), show the amount of the monthly balance as per bank statement, the interest to be placed by the trustee to the credit of the proper county fund.

Acts 1909, ch. 305, § 6; Shan., § 647a6; Code 1932, § 1044; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 16, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 5-815; Acts 1993, ch. 315, § 1; 2003, ch. 90, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2, directed the code commission to change all references from “county executive” to “county mayor” and to include all such changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.

Cross-References. Option to redesignate county mayor as county executive by private act, § 5-6-101.

5-8-207. County officers — Securing funds — Mandatory accounts.

Every county official handling public funds shall be required to maintain an official bank account in a bank or banks within this state, and shall, within three (3) days after the receipt by such county official of any public funds, deposit the funds to the credit of such county official's official bank account, or bank accounts. Each county official maintaining an official bank account is authorized to enter into such agreements with banks and other financial institutions as necessary for the maintenance of collateral to secure the funds on deposit; provided, that the deposit of county funds in banks or financial institutions by a county trustee shall be done in accordance with § 5-8-201.

All funds deposited with a bank or other financial institution shall be secured by collateral in the same manner and under the same conditions as state deposits under title 9, chapter 4, parts 1 and 4, or as provided in a collateral pool created under title 9, chapter 4, part 5.

This requirement shall not prohibit a county official handling public funds from maintaining a petty cash fund in an account sufficient for the transaction of the official business of such county official's office.

Every county official handling public funds shall be required to make all disbursements of such public funds by consecutively prenumbered warrants or consecutively prenumbered checks drawn on such county official's official bank account or bank accounts.

A violation of this section is a Class C misdemeanor.

Acts 1953, ch. 43, §§ 1-3 (Williams, §§ 1902.4-1902.6); Acts 1977, ch. 118, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 5-816 — 5-818; 5-8-208, 5-8-209; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113; 1993, ch. 315, § 16; 1994, ch. 752, § 2.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.

Attorney General Opinions. Inmate funds established by or for the benefit of the inmate while incarcerated and not collected for governmental or public purposes are private funds rather than public funds, OAG 06-156, 2006 Tenn. AG LEXIS 176 (10/9/06).

5-8-208, 5-8-209. [Transferred.]

Compiler's Notes. Sections 5-8-208 and 5-8-209 (Acts 1953, ch. 43, §§ 2, 3 (Williams, §§ 1902.5, 1902.6); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 5-817, 5-818) were transferred in 1985 to § 5-8-207.

5-8-210. Checking system.

Each county trustee may adopt a checking system for the disbursing of county funds by the county trustee as prescribed by this section by giving at least thirty (30) days notice to each official authorized to sign checks. Once adopted, any trustee may, with the approval of the county finance committee created pursuant to § 5-8-201, or with the approval of the county legislative body, discontinue the application of this section.

For purposes of this section, the “county master account” means all accounts maintained by the county trustee for the purpose of handling banking transactions of the various county funds required by law to be managed by the county trustee, except for any check clearing account as defined in subsection (c). The county trustee shall reconcile all county master accounts and shall maintain all records as required by law relating to such accounts, including maintaining paid checks.

For purposes of this section, “check clearing account” includes any account created for combined offices and departments or created for separate offices or departments, or both, that the county trustee establishes as a separate checking account for county payrolls or as a method of certifying checks. If any check clearing account is established, such account shall be reconciled by the county trustee, except that a separate clearing account established for a single office or department shall be reconciled by that office or department; provided, that if the county trustee deems it necessary or advisable, the county trustee may reconcile any check clearing account established for a single office or department, which shall include maintaining the paid checks.

Any financial institution charges incurred by a county for a county master account or for a check clearing account shall be an allowable office expense for the county trustee; provided, that any financial institution charges incurred for a check clearing account established for a single office or department shall be a charge against the funds of the office or department.

In any county coming under this section, a county master account and a check clearing account shall be established by the county trustee at a financial institution selected by the county finance committee created pursuant to § 5-8-201 or, if the county legislative body has not created a county finance committee or the county finance committee fails to specify one (1) or more financial institutions, then the county trustee may select a financial institution authorized to handle such account. Any financial institution shall be selected based on the institution offering the highest and best bid or bids to pay interest on daily balances of the county's funds, considering the lowest service charges, and considering other factors affecting safety and liquidity of county moneys.

When the financial institution has been selected, the county trustee shall establish one (1) or more county master bank accounts or one (1) or more check clearing accounts, or both, and have each official authorized by law to sign checks drawn on each account to complete forms as required by the financial institution. The forms shall be completed and returned to the financial institution prior to any checks being issued on the account. Persons who have the authority to sign checks drawn on the account shall promptly complete these forms and return them to the county trustee. The county trustee shall maintain a copy of these forms and shall provide a copy of each completed form to the county mayor and to each person who is authorized to sign checks drawn on the account.

The county trustee, in conjunction with the financial institution, may designate specifications for checks used to make withdrawals on any account established pursuant to this section. In the event of a written objection to the specifications by the county mayor, a department head, the director of accounts and budgets, or the director of finance is filed with the trustee, the county trustee's specifications for checks shall be approved by the finance committee created pursuant to § 5-8-201, or by the county legislative body.

In any county that adopts this section, the issuance of checks shall be certified by one (1) of the following methods adopted by the county trustee:

List Certification Method. This method requires each department, including the county mayor, a department head, director of accounts and budgets, and a director of finance, to submit a list by fund to the county trustee of the checks being issued showing the date of the check, check number, payee and amount. The county trustee verifies the department's fund balance and certifies that funds are available or will be available in the “check clearing account” for payment of those checks. The county trustee then transfers funds from the “county master account” to the “check clearing account.” The county trustee may develop a procedure for emergency certification by the county trustee in circumstances where such would be reasonable, in which event the county trustee must be provided with a written document for certification by the end of the next business day;

Check Signing/Validation Method. This method requires each department, including the county mayor, department heads, director of accounts and budgets, and directors of finance, to submit a list to the county trustee of checks being issued showing the date of the check, check number, payee and amount. The county trustee verifies the department's fund balance. The county trustee signs or validates each check if sufficient funds are or will be available and makes any necessary transfer of funds from the master account to the check clearing account;

Combination Method. The method outlined in subdivision (h)(1) may be followed for some offices and departments, and the method outlined in subdivision (h)(2) followed for other offices and departments in the discretion of the county trustee; or

Any other certification method requested by the county trustee and approved by the comptroller of the treasury.

When the county trustee has certified that funds are available, the total amount certified shall be charged to the fund on which the check or checks are drawn on at least a daily basis so that a current balance is maintained.

Any reference in this code or regulations issued pursuant to this code that require or authorize the issuance or acceptance of a county warrant shall also authorize the issuance or acceptance of a check drawn pursuant to this section and, to the extent that this section conflicts with other laws or regulations, this section shall apply in any county in which this section has been adopted by the county trustee as provided in subsection (a).

Any person who signs or issues any check required by this section to be certified by the county trustee, that has not been certified by the county trustee in accordance with this section, is in violation of this section, subject to removal from position or office, and subject to personal liability for any improperly disbursed funds.

Acts 1992, ch. 743, §§ 1, 2; 1995, ch. 130, § 1; 2003, ch. 90, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2, directed the code commission to change all references from “county executive” to “county mayor” and to include all such changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.

Cross-References. Option to redesignate county mayor as county executive by private act, § 5-6-101.